Hawaii statutes.
§449-5.5 Net capital. The net capital
of any corporation engaging in the escrow depository business under this
chapter shall not be less than $100,000. The amount of the minimum net capital
of $100,000 shall be maintained at all times by the licensee. [L 1973, c 174,
§§1, 2; am L 1976, c 101, §1; am L 2013, c 166, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next